Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-455
Methamphetamine Awareness and Education Fund; created; use; investment.

The Methamphetamine Awareness and Education Fund is created. The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice shall use the fund to support projects relating to educating retailers and the public on the dangers of methamphetamine. The commission may accept contributions, gifts, grants, and bequests for such purposes and remit them to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2001, LB 113, § 8.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.